North Dakota, session 69, HB1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-22-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-22-03. Criminal trespass - Noncriminal offense on posted property.
1. An individual is guilty of a class C felony if, knowing the individual is not licensed or privileged
to do so, the individual enters or remains in a dwelling or in highly secured premises.
2. An individual who unlawfully detains, occupies, or trespasses upon a residential dwelling is
guilty of a class C felony for the first offense and a class B felony for a second or subsequen t
offense if the second or subsequent offense occurred at the same residential dwelling as the
first offense.
3. An individual is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if, knowing the individual is not licensed or
privileged to do so, the individual:
a. Enters or remains in or on any building, occupied structure, or storage structure, or
separately secured or occupied portion thereof; or
b. Enters or remains in any place enclosed by a fence or otherwise enclosed as manifestly
to exclude intruders, unless the individual is a licensed hunter or angler who is lawfully
hunting or fishing. For purposes of this subdivision, "fence" means a permanent structure
on nonurban, private property which is maintained and capable of containing livestock.
3.4. a. An individual is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if, knowing the individual is not licensed
or privileged to do so, the individual enters or remains in any place as to which notice
against trespass is given by actual communication to the actor by the owner or an
individual authorized by the owner or by posting in a manner reasonably likely to come to
the attention of intruders. The name of the person posting the premises must appear on
each sign in legible characters.
b. Even if the conduct of the owner or individual authorized by the owner varies from the
provisions of subdivision a, an individual may be found guilty of violating subdivision a if
the owner or individual authorized by the owner substantially complied with subdivision a
and notice against trespass is clear from the circumstances.
c. An individual who violates subdivision a is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for the second
or subsequent offense within a two-year period.
4.5. a. A peace officer may cite an individual who, knowing the individual is not licensed or
privileged to do so, entered or remained in a place as to which notice against trespass is
given by posting in a manner reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders or a
place enclosed by a fence as defined in subsection 2, with a noncriminal offense. An
individual cited under this subsection may not be prosecuted under subsection 2 or 3 for
the same offense.

H. B. NO. 1305 - PAGE 2
b. The fine for a citation under subdivision a is two hundred fifty dollars for each violation.
c. The peace officer citing the individual shall:
(1) Take the name and address of the individual; and
(2) Notify the individual of the right to request a hearing if posting bond by mail.
d. The peace officer may not take the individual into custody or require the individual to
proceed with the peace officer to any other location for the purpose of posting bond. The
officer shall provide the individual with an envelope for use in mailing the bond.
e. An individual cited may appear before the designated official and pay the statutory fine
for the violation at or before the time scheduled for hearing.
f. If the individual has posted bond, the individual may forfeit bond by not appearing at the
designated time.
g. If the individual posts bond by mail, the bond must be submitted within fourteen days of
the date of the citation and the individual cited shall indicate on the envelope or citation
whether a hearing is requested. If the individual does not request a hearing within
fourteen days of the date of the citation, the bond is deemed forfeited and the individual
is deemed to have admitted to the violation and to have waived the right to a hearing on
the issue of commission of the violation. If the individual requests a hearing, the court for
the county in which the citation is issued shall issue a summons to the individual
requesting the hearing notifying the individual of the date of the hearing before the
designated official.
h. Upon appearing at the hearing scheduled in the citation or otherwise scheduled at the
individual's request, the individual may make a statement in explanation of the
individual's action. The official may at that time waive or suspend the statutory fine or
bond.
i. A citing peace officer may not receive the statutory fine or bond.
j. The bond required to secure appearance before the judge must be identical to the
statutory fine established in subdivision b.
5.6. An individual is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if that individual remains upon the property of
another after being requested to leave the property by a duly authorized individual. An
individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for the second or
subsequent offense within a two-year period.
6.7. This section does not apply to a peace officer in the course of discharging the peace officer's
official duties.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 12.1-22-06 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. "Dwelling" has the meaning prescribed in subsection 2 of section 12.1-05-12means real
property or residential property, including a building, structure, or part of a building or
structure, used or intended to be used as a home or residence.

H. B. NO. 1305 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1305.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State